Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Chapter 4

Levees

69-4-101. Bonds for building levees.

The county legislative bodies of the several counties, within the limits of which are lands rendered unfit for occupation and farming purposes by reason of the overflowing of the lands in times of high water in the rivers adjacent to the lands, may issue bonds pursuant to title 9, chapter 21 for the purpose of constructing levees to protect the lands.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, § 1; Shan., § 3855; Code 1932, § 4193; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-601; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 67; T.C.A. §69-5-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§69-4-101 —69-4-106 (Acts 1858, §§ 2156-2161 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 71, § 1); Shan., §§ 3849-3854; Code 1932, §§ 4187-4192; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-501 — 70-506), concerning drains and ditches, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 179, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

69-4-102. [Reserved.]

The county legislative body of the county issuing the bonds shall appoint not less than three (3) nor more than five (5) persons to superintend the construction of the levee, who shall be denominated “the levee commissioners,” and who shall, before entering upon their duties, take an oath for the faithful discharge of their duties, and enter into bond to account for all sums passing into their hands, in such sum as the county legislative body shall deem sufficient.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, § 7; Shan., § 3860; Code 1932, § 4198; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-606; T.C.A. §69-5-103.

69-4-104. Engineer — Contracts.

The levee commissioners shall employ a competent engineer to assist them in the location and construction of such levee, and shall have power to let out contracts for the work.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, §§ 8-10; Shan., §§ 3861-3863; Code 1932, §§ 4199-4201; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-607 — 70-609; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 69; T.C.A. §69-5-104.

69-4-105. Condemnation of real estate for construction of levee.

The commissioners may take the real estate of any person, not exceeding the amount necessary for the construction and maintenance of the levee, by petition filed in the circuit court of the county in which the land lies, setting forth in substance:

The land wanted;

The name of the owner, or, if unknown, stating that fact; and

With a prayer for the land designated to be decreed to the county.

Notice of the filing of this petition shall be given to the owner of the land, or, if the owner is a nonresident of the county, to the owner's agent, and if a nonresident of the state, notice shall be given in the usual mode by publication in lieu of personal service.

The notice provided for in subsection (b) for shall require the defendants to appear on the first Monday in some specified month, and be served five (5) days before that day, after which time, if no cause to the contrary is shown, the clerk of the court shall issue a writ of inquiry to the sheriff to summon a jury to inquire and assess the damages, and the report of the jury shall be reduced to writing, signed by a majority of the persons, and returned to the next term of the court.

If no objection to the report is made, it may be confirmed by the court, and the land decreed to the county, and the amount of damages so assessed to each party by the jury shall be made a part of the record decreeing the title to the county.

The damages so assessed shall be claimed by the persons interested, by written notice to that effect filed with the clerk of the circuit court, within one (1) year from the confirmation of the report of the jurors, and in case of failure to do so, they shall be forever barred.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, §§ 11-15; Shan., §§ 3864-3868; Code 1932, §§ 4202-4206; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-610—70-614; T.C.A. §69-5-105.

Cross-References. Eminent domain procedure, title 29, ch. 16.

69-4-106. Certain sections incorporated in chapter.

Sections 29-16-106, 29-16-108, 29-16-109, 29-16-112, 29-16-113, 29-16-117 — 29-16-119, and 29-16-121 shall apply to and be taken and construed as parts of this chapter, insofar as they are applicable to the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, § 16; Shan., § 3869; Code 1932, § 4207; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-615; T.C.A. §69-5-106.

69-4-107. Subscriptions.

The commissioners provided for in § 69-4-103 are authorized to accept subscriptions of either money or property for the use of the county appointing them, and they may receive subscriptions, in this manner, of land lying in other counties, and take deeds to the land as trustees of the county.

The subscriptions so received shall be reported to the county legislative body within one (1) year after having been received, and in case of failure they shall each pay the sum of three hundred dollars ($300), to be collected at the suit of the county trustee, for the use of the county.

Acts 1871, ch. 131, §§ 17, 18; Shan., §§ 3870, 3871; Code 1932, §§ 4208, 4209; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-616, 70-617; T.C.A. §69-5-107.

69-4-108. Counties may retain state's increment of taxes.

Any county that has legally incurred, or may hereafter incur, a bonded indebtedness for the purpose of constructing or aiding in the construction of a levee or levees or drainage to reclaim and improve the low, wet, and overflowed lands within the county or in the state, whereby the taxable values of the property in such county or state have been or may be materially increased, shall be entitled to retain out of the revenue due by such county to the state, such increment of taxes so realized for the state, because of such enhancement of values, as have been or may be traceable to the issuance of such bonds for such purpose, and the works done in pursuance thereof in the construction of such levee or levees or drainage.

The trustee of any such county, in making payments to the proper officers of the state of the revenue collected by the trustee and payable to the state, is allowed, and it is the trustee's duty, to retain such increment of taxes as provided for in subsection (a), and for the purpose of ascertaining and determining the amount that the trustee shall so be entitled to retain, the commissioner of revenue is empowered, and it is made the commissioner's duty, to make all necessary investigations as to the facts; and the commissioner shall then make a settlement with the trustee of such county, whereby the commissioner will ascertain, determine, and fix the exact amount that the trustee shall be allowed to retain, as the increment of such taxes. Such settlement shall be made each year at the time of the final settlement made with the trustee of such county of the accounts with the state for taxes collected by the trustee.

At the time of settlement, the commissioner of revenue shall be required to take from such trustee a written statement signed by the trustee, showing the exact amount so retained by the trustee, and such receipt shall be filed and kept by the commissioner as evidence of the amounts so retained, which otherwise should and would have been paid to the state.

In ascertaining, determining, and fixing the amount of such taxes accruing in favor of the state, the commissioner of revenue shall take and consider, among other facts, the assessed taxable values of property of such county for the year next preceding the issuance of such bonds; and in no event shall the taxes to be paid to the state be less than on an amount of taxable property equal to the amount as assessed in and for such county in the year next preceding the issuance of the bonds.

All such taxes to be left in the hands of the trustee shall be and become the property of such county, shall be and constitute a fund to discharge the bonded indebtedness and interest on the bonds, and shall not be used by such county or its officers for any other purpose; but the county, by and through its proper officers, shall by proper action provide for the appropriation of such moneys to the payment, discharge of the bonds and interest on the bonds, or to the purchase of the bonds.

All the provisions of this section shall remain in force and effect during the term of years for which the bonds are to run before maturity, unless they are paid sooner, but in no event to extend beyond the payment of such bonds, or the date of their maturity.

Acts 1901, ch. 65, §§ 1-6; Shan., §§ 3871a1-3871a6; mod. Code 1932, §§ 4210-4215; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 50, 51; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-618—70-623; T.C.A. §69-5-108.

69-4-103. Commissioners.